North Carolina, session 2025, SB945.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Chapter 130A of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 25.
"Youth Camps and Campground Safety.
"Part 1. Youth Camps.
"§ 130A-512. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Cabin. – A structure used to provide temporary sleeping quarters for campers.
(2) Camper. – A minor attending a youth camp on a day or residential basis.
(3) Day camp. – A youth camp that operates during any portion of the day
between 7:00 A.M. and 10:00 P.M. for a period of four or more consecutive
days and that provides no more than two incidental overnight stays per camp
session. The term does not include a facility required to be licensed as a child
care facility under Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes.
(4) Floodplain. – The base floodplain or 100-year floodplain as defined in
G.S. 143-215.52(1b). The term includes any area removed from the 100-year
floodplain by a letter of map amendment, a letter of map revision based on
fill, or a substantially similar administrative process conducted by the Federal
Emergency Management Agency.
(5) Floodway. – The regulatory floodway, if any, as shown on the current
floodplain maps prepared pursuant to the National Flood Insurance Program
or approved by the Department of Public Safety. If a regulatory floodway is
not shown on the applicable floodplain map used for a determination under
this Part, the term includes a floodway delineated in accordance with rules
adopted pursuant to G.S. 130A-515(d).
(6) Youth camp. – A facility or property, not licensed under Article 7 of Chapter
110 of the General Statutes, that provides structured recreational, athletic,
*S945-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
religious, or educational activities to minors for four or more consecutive
days, including residential, primitive, and day camps.
(7) Youth camp operator. – A person who owns, operates, controls, or supervises
a youth camp, regardless of profit status.
"§ 130A-513. Religious sponsored child care facilities.
(a) Applicability. – Notwithstanding G.S. 110-106(b)(4), a religious sponsored child care
facility operating pursuant to G.S. 110-106 that operates a day camp, as defined in
G.S. 130A‑512(3), shall comply with G.S. 130A-520(d) and G.S. 130A-522 with respect to that
day camp.
(b) Permit and Other Requirements Not Applicable. – A facility described in subsection
(a) of this section is not required to obtain a permit under G.S. 130A-514 to operate the day camp
and is not subject to the requirements of this Part or rules adopted under this Part. This subsection
does not exempt the facility from G.S. 130A-520(d) or G.S. 130A-522, or rules adopted to
implement those sections, and G.S. 130A-523 applies to the extent necessary to inspect and
enforce compliance with G.S. 130A-520(d) and G.S. 130A-522.
(c) Religious Training; No Regulation of Doctrine. – Consistent with G.S. 110-106(b)(4),
nothing in this Article shall be construed to authorize the Department, the Commission, or a local
health department to regulate or otherwise interfere with religious doctrine, religious instruction,
worship, curriculum, or internal church governance. This Article shall be applied to a facility
described in subsection (a) of this section solely as a program of health and safety regulation.
(d) Inspection Scope. – Any inspection or request for records by the Department or a
local health department under this Article of a facility described in subsection (a) of this section
shall be limited to matters reasonably necessary to determine compliance with G.S. 130A-520(d)
and G.S. 130A-522.
(e) Floodplain Documentation. – A facility described in subsection (a) of this section
shall maintain documentation supporting floodplain and floodway determinations made to
comply with G.S. 130A-520(d) and the parent notice required by G.S. 130A-522(j)(2) and shall
make the documentation available to the Department or a local health department upon request
in the form and manner prescribed by rule.
"§ 130A-514. Permit required; issuance by Department.
(a) Permit Required. – Except as provided in G.S. 130A-513, no person shall operate a
youth camp without a permit issued annually by the Department.
(b) Issuance and Renewal; Conditions. – The Department shall issue or renew a permit
under this Part only if the Department determines the youth camp is in compliance with this Part
and rules adopted pursuant to this Part, including approval of the emergency plan required by
G.S. 130A-522. In making this determination, the Department shall consider the most recent
inspection report submitted under G.S. 130A-523 and other information required by rule.
(c) Continuation Pending Renewal. – If a youth camp operator submits a complete
application for renewal under G.S. 130A-517, including payment of the applicable fee required
by G.S. 130A-518, in a form and manner prescribed by the Department, before expiration of the
current permit, the current permit shall remain in effect until the Department takes final action
on the renewal application. During the period the current permit remains in effect under this
subsection, the youth camp operator shall comply with the most recent emergency plan approved
under G.S. 130A-522. This subsection does not limit the authority of the Department or a local
health director to take enforcement action as authorized by law.
(d) Updated Application Required After Material Changes. – A youth camp operator
shall submit an updated application to the Department in the manner prescribed by the
Department not later than 30 days after the operator does any of the following:
(1) Alters the boundaries of a youth camp.
(2) Completes construction of one or more new cabins on the premises of the
camp.
Page 2 Senate Bill 945-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Completes any renovation to an existing cabin on the premises of the camp
that does either of the following:
a. Increases or decreases the number of beds in the cabin.
b. Alters the method of ingress or egress for the cabin.
(e) Single Youth Camp Permit. – A permit issued under this Part satisfies any permit
requirement under rules adopted by the Commission for Public Health for the operation of a
youth camp, including rules governing summer camps, resident camps, and primitive experience
camps. This subsection does not affect the applicability of permits required for food service
establishments, lodging establishments, public swimming pools, onsite wastewater systems, or
potable water supplies under other applicable provisions of law.
"§ 130A-515. Administration; Department oversight; rulemaking; coordination with other
health and safety programs.
(a) Department Oversight. – The Department shall oversee implementation of this Part
and shall provide standardized forms, technical assistance, data systems, and program audits. The
Department may enter into agreements with local health departments and other governmental
agencies as authorized by law to carry out the purposes of this Part.
(b) Rulemaking. – The Commission for Public Health shall adopt rules to implement this
Part, including rules to classify youth camps and to establish minimum statewide standards for
their health and safety. Such rules may create subclasses of camps, including day camps,
residential camps, and primitive experience camps, and shall address sanitation, potable water
and wastewater, food service, lodging, aquatic safety, emergency planning and communications,
staffing qualifications and ratios, incident reporting, record keeping, inspections, and related
matters. Rules adopted under this subsection shall be consistent with this Part and other
applicable law.
(c) Coordination. – Nothing in this Part limits the applicability of other State health and
safety laws or rules concerning food service, lodging and sanitation, public swimming pools and
bathing places, onsite wastewater systems, communicable disease control, or related matters. The
Department shall, to the extent practicable, coordinate inspections and enforcement under this
Part with those programs to minimize duplication and burden on regulated entities.
(d) Floodplain and Floodway Determinations. – The Commission after consultation with
the Division of Emergency Management of the Department of Public Safety shall adopt rules
establishing a uniform statewide methodology for determinations under G.S. 130A-517(5),
130A-520, and 130A-522(j)(2). The rules shall do all of the following:
(1) Specify the floodplain mapping sources and flood hazard maps that shall be
used and the order of precedence among those sources, consistent with the
definition of "base floodplain" or "100‑year floodplain" in
G.S. 143-215.52(1b) and the definition of "floodway" in G.S. 130A-512(5).
(2) Specify the minimum documentation required to support a determination as
to whether (i) any cabin is located within a floodplain and (ii) any portion of
the youth camp premises is located within a floodplain, including required
map identifiers, effective dates, and geospatial exhibits.
(3) Specify the methodology for determining whether a cabin is located at least
1,000 feet from a floodway for purposes of G.S. 130A-520(b)(2), including
the method of measurement and the minimum documentation required to
support the determination. The rules shall also do all of the following:
a. Specify procedures and minimum technical standards for delineating
a floodway for purposes of G.S. 130A-520(b)(2) when a regulatory
floodway is not shown on the applicable floodplain map.
b. Specify the minimum documentation required to support a delineation
under sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision, which may include a
geospatial exhibit. The rules may require certification of the
Senate Bill 945-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
delineation by a professional engineer licensed to practice in this State
or by another qualified professional as determined by rule.
(4) Require the Department to provide standardized forms, templates, and
instructions for documenting floodplain determinations and floodway
measurements and to make those materials available to local health
departments and applicants.
(5) Provide a process or identify an existing process by which an applicant may
submit supplemental information recognized by rule to resolve a disputed
determination.
(6) Require retention of the documentation supporting the determination in the
permit file or, for a facility described in G.S. 130A-513, in the records
maintained by the facility in accordance with G.S. 130A-513(e), for a period
specified by rule.
"§ 130A-516. Youth Camp Safety Multidisciplinary Team.
(a) Establishment. – The Youth Camp Safety Multidisciplinary Team (Team) is
established within the Department to advise the Department and the Commission for Public
Health on implementation of this Part, including emergency planning, flood hazards, warning
and communications capabilities, and coordination with other public safety and health and safety
programs.
(b) Membership. – The Team shall consist of the following members, or their designees:
(1) The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services, who shall
serve as chair.
(2) A representative of the Division of Public Health.
(3) A representative of the Division of Emergency Management in the
Department of Public Safety.
(4) A representative of the Office of the State Fire Marshal in the Department of
Insurance.
(5) A representative of the Department of Environmental Quality with expertise
in flood hazards, floodplain mapping, or dam safety.
(6) A representative of the North Carolina Forest Service in the Department of
Agriculture and Consumer Services.
(7) A representative of the Wildlife Resources Commission.
(8) One local health director appointed by the Secretary.
(9) One county emergency management coordinator or director appointed by the
Director of the Division of Emergency Management.
(c) Duties. – The Team shall do all of the following:
(1) Advise the Department and the Commission on rulemaking under this Part
related to emergency planning, warning and communications capabilities, and
flood hazards.
(2) Recommend model emergency plan templates, checklists, training materials,
and inspection tools to support consistent statewide implementation.
(3) Identify best practices for severe weather and flood preparedness and for
coordination between youth camps and local emergency services and
emergency management.
(4) Recommend methods to prioritize oversight, training, and audits based on risk
factors such as flood hazards, proximity to watercourses, camper capacity, and
remoteness.
(5) Review anonymized program data and incident trends made available by the
Department, consistent with confidentiality requirements, and recommend
updates to guidance and training.
Page 4 Senate Bill 945-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Develop and recommend to the Commission and the Department proposed
minimum statewide standards for youth camp health and safety for adoption
by rule under this Part.
(d) Administration. – The Department shall provide staff support to the Team. Members
shall receive no compensation for serving but may receive travel and subsistence expenses in
accordance with State law.
(e) Meetings. – The Team shall meet at least twice each year and may meet more
frequently at the call of the chair.
"§ 130A-517. Permit application.
(a) Application Requirements. – An application for a youth camp permit shall be
submitted to the Department on Department-prescribed forms and shall include all of the
following:
(1) Facility plans and approvals required by rule.
(2) Documentation of potable water supply approval and wastewater system
approval, as applicable.
(3) A staffing and training plan as required by rule.
(4) The emergency plan required by G.S. 130A-522.
(5) Documentation sufficient to determine whether any cabin on the youth camp
premises is located within a floodplain and whether any portion of the youth
camp premises is located within a floodplain, as specified by rule, including
rules governing mapping source hierarchy and documentation standards. If
the youth camp operator seeks to qualify for the exception under
G.S. 130A-520(b)(2), the application shall also include documentation
sufficient to determine whether each cabin located within a floodplain is
located at least 1,000 feet from a floodway, as shown on the applicable
floodplain map or delineated in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to
G.S. 130A-515(d), measured in the manner prescribed by rule.
(6) Proof of liability insurance in an amount set by rule.
(b) Completeness Review. – Within 10 business days after submission to the Department,
through the Department's electronic submission process, of (i) an application under this section
or (ii) an emergency plan under G.S. 130A-522(f), the Department shall notify the submitter
whether the submission is complete. A submission identified as incomplete shall not be
considered received for purposes of any statutory review period.
"§ 130A-518. Fees; Youth Camp Oversight Fund.
(a) Fee Schedule. – The Commission shall establish by rule a uniform statewide fee
schedule for initial and renewal permits issued under this Part. The fee schedule may include
tiers based on camp classification, camper capacity, or other factors specified by rule. Fees shall
be set in an amount reasonably related to the cost of administering and enforcing this Part at the
State and local levels. A fee established under this subsection shall not exceed the applicable
maximum amount set in subsection (b) of this section. An application for an initial permit or
renewal submitted under G.S. 130A-517 is not complete unless accompanied by the applicable
fee established under this section.
(b) Maximum Fees. – The fee schedule established under subsection (a) of this section
shall not exceed the following maximum amounts:
(1) Initial permit. – One thousand dollars ($1,000) per youth camp.
(2) Renewal permit. – One thousand dollars ($1,000) per youth camp.
(3) Review of updated application. – Two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) per
submission required under G.S. 130A-514(d).
(c) Collection; Allocation; Remittance; Local Use. – The Department shall collect all fees
assessed under subsection (a) of this section. Twenty percent (20%) of each fee collected under
this section (the State share) shall be credited to the Youth Camp Oversight Fund established in
Senate Bill 945-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
subsection (d) of this section. Eighty percent (80%) of each fee collected under this section (the
local share) shall be remitted to the local health department having jurisdiction over the youth
camp to support inspections and enforcement under this Part, in the manner and at intervals
prescribed by the Department. The Department shall remit the local share not less than quarterly.
The local health department shall deposit amounts remitted under this subsection to the account
of the local health department and shall use the amounts only for local youth camp safety
programs and activities under this Part, in accordance with the Local Government Budget and
Fiscal Control Act.
(d) Youth Camp Oversight Fund. – The Youth Camp Oversight Fund is established as a
special, nonreverting fund within the Department. Funds in the Fund shall be used only to support
implementation of this Part, including statewide rulemaking, oversight, training, audits, technical
assistance, and data systems.
(e) Review. – The Commission shall review the fee schedule at least once every two
years and shall revise the schedule as necessary to ensure that fees remain reasonably related to
program costs.
(f) Late Payment; Suspension for Nonpayment; Reinstatement. – The Department shall
assess a late payment fee of twenty‑five dollars ($25.00) to a youth camp operator that fails to
pay a fee assessed under subsection (a) of this section within 45 days after billing by the
Department. The Department may, in accordance with G.S. 130A-23, suspend a permit of a youth
camp that fails to pay the required fee within 60 days after billing by the Department. The
Department shall assess a reinstatement fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) to a youth
camp operator that requests reinstatement of its permit after the permit has been suspended under
this subsection. Late payment fees and reinstatement fees collected under this subsection shall
be credited to the Youth Camp Oversight Fund. The Commission shall adopt rules to implement
this subsection.
(g) Refunds. – Fees collected under this section are not refundable, except when the
Department determines a fee was collected in error.
"§ 130A-519. Online list of permitted youth camps.
The Department shall establish, maintain, and update on its public website a list of youth
camps holding an active permit under this Part.
"§ 130A-520. Floodplain cabins; permitting prohibited.
(a) General Prohibition. – The Department shall not issue or renew a permit to a youth
camp if any cabin on the youth camp premises is located wholly or partially within a floodplain.
(b) Exception. – Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Department may issue
or renew a permit to a youth camp described by subsection (a) of this section only if the youth
camp operator demonstrates, in the form and manner prescribed by the Department and as
specified by rule, that at least one of the following applies:
(1) Each cabin located wholly or partially within a floodplain is within the
floodplain as a result of the cabin's proximity to a lake, pond, or other still
body of water that meets either of the following conditions:
a. The body of water is not connected to a stream, river, or other
watercourse.
b. The body of water is dammed.
(2) Each cabin located wholly or partially within a floodplain is located at least
1,000 feet from a floodway, as shown on the applicable floodplain map or
delineated in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to G.S. 130A-515(d),
measured in the manner prescribed by rule.
(c) Emergency Ladders for Floodplain Cabins. – If the Department issues or renews a
permit under subsection (b) of this section, the youth camp operator shall install and maintain,
for each cabin located wholly or partially within a floodplain, an emergency ladder capable of
providing access to the cabin's roof. The ladder shall meet minimum standards established by
Page 6 Senate Bill 945-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
rule. The rules may be adopted under Part 2 of this Article and shall be consistent with
G.S. 130A-527(a)(1).
(d) Religious Sponsored Child Care Facilities. – Notwithstanding G.S. 110-106(b)(4), a
facility described in G.S. 130A-513 shall not use, for lodging or sleeping by campers, any cabin
located wholly or partially within a floodplain unless the facility demonstrates, in the form and
manner prescribed by the Department and as specified by rule, that at least one of the conditions
in subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (b) of this section applies for each such cabin and installs
and maintains an emergency ladder meeting the minimum standards established by rule pursuant
to subsection (c) of this section for each such cabin.
"§ 130A-521. Minimum standards; rule coordination.
(a) Minimum Standards. – The Commission for Public Health shall adopt and maintain
rules establishing minimum standards for youth camps, including all of the following:
(1) Camper health screening and communicable disease prevention, reporting,
and control.
(2) Staffing ratios and staff training, including cardiopulmonary resuscitation,
first aid, and child abuse recognition and reporting.
(3) Facility sanitation, drinking water, wastewater, food service, and lodging.
(4) Swimming pools, natural water activities, and aquatic safety.
(5) Emergency action planning, drills, communications, and records under
G.S. 130A-522.
(6) Incident reporting and record keeping.
(b) Coordination. – Rules adopted under this section shall be coordinated with other State
health and safety programs and shall avoid duplicative requirements. The rules may rely on
existing State rules concerning food service, lodging and sanitation, public swimming pools and
bathing places, onsite wastewater systems, potable water supplies, communicable disease
control, and related matters.
(c) Applicability of Part 2. – The Commission shall adopt rules making applicable to
youth camps the requirements of Part 2 of this Article in the same manner those requirements
apply to a campground under that Part.
"§ 130A-522. Emergency plans; communications; orientation; training; submissions.
(a) Emergency Plan. – Each youth camp operator shall develop, implement, and maintain
an emergency plan that, at a minimum, provides procedures for all of the following:
(1) Responding to a lost camper.
(2) Fire in a structure or open area on camp premises.
(3) Severe injury, severe illness, serious accident, or fatality of campers, visitors,
volunteers, or staff on premises or under camp supervision.
(4) Aquatic emergencies if the camp borders or uses a watercourse, lake, pond, or
other body of water.
(5) Severe weather and disasters, including tornado, flash flood or flood,
hurricane, wildfire, dam failure, hazardous materials release, extreme heat,
and winter storm conditions.
(6) Evacuation and shelter in place, including designation of muster zones for
campers and youth camp staff and procedures to identify and account for each
camper.
(7) Notification and communication with all of the following:
a. Local emergency services and the county emergency management
coordinator for the county in which the youth camp is located and, if
applicable, the municipal emergency management coordinator for the
municipality in which the youth camp is located.
b. Camp administrative and medical staff.
Senate Bill 945-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. Parents or legal guardians of campers participating in the camp
session.
(8) An epidemic or other communicable disease outbreak affecting campers or
staff.
(9) An unauthorized or unknown individual present on the youth camp premises.
(10) A transportation emergency, including incidents occurring while campers are
in transit under camp supervision.
(11) Any other natural disaster or emergency event designated by rule.
(b) Activation Triggers. – The emergency plan shall identify objective triggers for
activating the procedures required by subsection (a) of this section, which shall include (i)
issuance by the National Weather Service of a tornado warning, flash flood warning, or flood
warning for the area of the camp and (ii) issuance of an evacuation order, shelter in place order,
or other movement or shelter directive by the Governor or by a municipality or county with
jurisdiction under Chapter 166A of the General Statutes, and may include site-specific indicators
of an imminent hazard observable by camp staff.
(c) Implementation. – A youth camp operator shall implement the emergency plan
required by this section upon the occurrence of an activation trigger identified in the plan under
subsection (b) of this section. At a minimum, the youth camp operator shall implement the
evacuation and shelter in place procedures required by subdivision (a)(6) of this section on
issuance by the National Weather Service of a tornado warning, flash flood warning, or flood
warning for the area of the camp.
(d) Emergency Preparedness Coordinator. – The youth camp operator shall designate an
emergency preparedness coordinator in the plan.
(e) Warning and Communications Capabilities. – The Commission shall adopt rules
requiring a youth camp operator to provide and maintain, at each youth camp operated by the
operator, warning and communications capabilities. A youth camp operator shall certify
annually, in a form and manner prescribed by the Department, to the Department that the youth
camp is in compliance with this subsection and rules adopted pursuant to this subsection. The
rules shall require that the capabilities meet at least all of the following performance
requirements:
(1) An operable radio capable of providing real-time weather alerts issued by the
National Weather Service or a comparable professional weather service, as
specified by rule.
(2) A camp-wide warning method capable of alerting all campers and camp
occupants of an emergency, including a public address function operable
without reliance on an internet connection.
(3) Capability to monitor applicable local emergency notification systems.
(4) Where, in accordance with criteria established by rule, the Department
determines that a communications pathway not relying on commercial cellular
voice service or commercial cellular data service is available for installation
and operation to serve the youth camp, at least one required pathway shall not
rely on commercial cellular voice service or commercial cellular data service.
(f) Submission and Review. – The following apply:
(1) Submission. – The youth camp operator shall submit the emergency plan
required by this section with the permit application under G.S. 130A-517 and
annually thereafter with each application for renewal. A facility described in
G.S. 130A-513 shall submit the emergency plan required by this section to the
Department annually, and before beginning operation of the day camp in each
calendar year, in the form and manner prescribed by the Department,
including through any Department-administered electronic system.
Page 8 Senate Bill 945-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Department action. – Within 30 days after receipt of a plan submitted under
subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Department shall approve the plan or
provide the operator written notice of deficiencies.
(3) Deficiencies; resubmission. – If the Department determines the plan does not
meet the requirements of this section and minimum standards prescribed by
rules adopted by the Commission, the operator shall revise and resubmit the
plan within 45 days after receipt of the written notice of deficiencies.
(4) Department action on revised plan. – Within 30 days after receipt of a revised
plan submitted under subdivision (3) of this subsection, the Department shall
approve the revised plan or provide the operator written notice of any
remaining deficiencies.
(5) Permit condition. – Approval of the emergency plan under this subsection is
a condition of permit issuance and renewal under G.S. 130A-514.
(g) Consultation. – In reviewing and approving emergency plans under subsection (f) of
this section, the Department may consult with the local health department having jurisdiction,
county or municipal emergency management, and the Youth Camp Safety Multidisciplinary
Team established in G.S. 130A-516.
(h) Transmittal to Emergency Management. – The following apply:
(1) County transmittal. – Within 10 business days after approval of a plan under
subsection (f) of this section, the youth camp operator shall provide a copy of
the approved plan to the county emergency management coordinator
appointed pursuant to G.S. 166A-19.15(b) or otherwise designated for an
emergency management agency established under that statute, for the county
in which the youth camp is located, or the coordinator's designee.
(2) Municipal transmittal. – If the youth camp is located within a municipality
that has established an emergency management agency pursuant to
G.S. 166A-19.15(c), the operator shall also provide a copy of the approved
plan to the municipal emergency management coordinator, if any, or the
coordinator's designee.
(3) Religious sponsored child care facilities. – A facility described in
G.S. 130A-513 shall provide a copy of the plan submitted under subdivision
(f)(1) of this section to the county emergency management coordinator, or the
coordinator's designee, and, if applicable, to the municipal emergency
management coordinator, or the coordinator's designee, not later than 10
business days after submission and shall provide updated copies not later than
10 business days after any resubmission under subdivision (f)(3) of this
section.
(4) Joint agency. – If a joint emergency management agency has been formed
pursuant to G.S. 166A-19.15(d) with jurisdiction over the youth camp's
location, delivery to the coordinator, or the coordinator's designee, of the joint
agency satisfies subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection.
(i) Department Database. – The Department shall store in a digital database each
emergency plan approved under this section and each emergency plan submitted under
subdivision (f)(1) of this section by a facility described in G.S. 130A-513 and shall provide
access to that database to all of the following:
(1) The Division of Emergency Management in the Department of Public Safety.
(2) The county and municipal emergency management coordinators who receive
plans under subsection (h) of this section.
(3) The local health department having jurisdiction over the youth camp.
(4) The Youth Camp Safety Multidisciplinary Team established in
G.S. 130A-516, including each member or the member's designee.
Senate Bill 945-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(j) Parent Notice. – A youth camp operator shall:
(1) Provide the most recent emergency plan approved under this section to the
parent or legal guardian of a camper who is participating in a camp session
and to the parent or legal guardian of a prospective camper registered to
participate in a future camp session.
(2) Notify the parent or legal guardian described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection if any portion of the youth camp premises is located within a
floodplain.
(3) Ensure the parent or legal guardian signs and submits to the operator a
statement acknowledging receipt of the notice required under subdivision (2)
of this subsection.
(k) Camper Safety Orientation. – The youth camp operator or a youth camp staff member
shall conduct a mandatory safety orientation before a camper participates in any camp activities
other than check-in and, in all cases, not later than the end of the first day of the youth camp
session. The orientation shall do all of the following:
(1) Notify each camper of the camp's boundaries and hazards present on the camp
premises.
(2) Instruct each camper on behavioral expectations in an emergency event.
(3) Provide each camper developmentally appropriate instruction on actions and
procedures to follow in an emergency event, in accordance with the camp's
emergency plan required under this section.
(l) Annual Staff and Volunteer Training. – Before a youth camp staff member or
volunteer begins duties that involve supervising campers, and at least annually thereafter, a youth
camp operator shall do all of the following:
(1) Provide each youth camp staff member and volunteer with a copy of the
camp's most recent emergency plan.
(2) Ensure each staff member and volunteer successfully completes training on
the emergency plan that meets minimum standards and required hours
established by rule.
(3) Instruct each staff member and volunteer on proper procedures to follow in an
emergency event.
(4) Maintain written records documenting completion of training required by this
subsection.
(m) Posting; Illumination. – A youth camp operator shall do all of the following:
(1) Conspicuously post in each cabin on the youth camp premises the proper
evacuation route described in the emergency plan.
(2) Ensure each evacuation route designated in the emergency plan is illuminated
or otherwise clearly marked and visible at night, as specified by rule.
(n) Confidentiality. – An emergency plan submitted to, received by, or accessed by the
Department, the Youth Camp Safety Multidisciplinary Team, the Division of Emergency
Management, a county or municipal emergency management coordinator or director, a local
health department, or any other governmental entity under this section is not a public record as
defined in G.S. 132-1 and shall be kept confidential. The plan may be disclosed only to the extent
necessary to administer this section and for emergency management, public health, or law
enforcement purposes.
"§ 130A-523. Inspections and enforcement authority.
(a) Inspections. – A local health department shall inspect each youth camp at least once
each calendar year and as needed to ensure compliance. A local health department is not required
to conduct an annual inspection of a facility described in G.S. 130A-513 and may inspect such a
facility as needed to enforce G.S. 130A-520(d) and G.S. 130A-522. The local health department
Page 10 Senate Bill 945-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
shall submit to the Department an inspection report in the form and manner prescribed by the
Department.
(b) Right of Entry. – The Secretary and a local health director shall have the right of entry
upon the premises where entry is necessary to enforce this Chapter or rules adopted by the
Commission or a local board of health, as set out in G.S. 130A-17.
(c) Enforcement Authority. – The Secretary may deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse to
renew a permit issued under this Part in accordance with G.S. 130A-23. The Secretary and a local
health director may issue administrative orders requiring corrective action and may order
immediate closure where an imminent hazard exists in accordance with G.S. 130A-20, and other
remedies are available under G.S. 130A-18 and G.S. 130A-19. The local health department shall
notify the Department of enforcement actions taken under this subsection in the form and manner
prescribed by the Department.
(d) Appeals. – Appeals of actions taken by the Department under this Part shall proceed
as contested cases under Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, as provided in G.S. 130A-24(a)
through (a1). Appeals concerning the enforcement of rules adopted by the local board of health
or actions of the local health director shall be conducted in accordance with G.S. 130A-24(b)
through (d).
"§ 130A-524. Uniform data and reporting.
The Commission shall establish by rule uniform data elements and reporting intervals for
youth camps. Local health departments shall submit required data to the Department. The
Department shall publish an annual summary of program activity and compliance, subject to
applicable confidentiality laws. By October 1 each year, the Department shall publish a summary
of receipts and expenditures from the Youth Camp Oversight Fund for the prior fiscal year.
"Part 2. Campground Safety.
"§ 130A-526. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Cabin. – A structure used to provide temporary sleeping quarters for
occupants of a campground.
(2) Campground. – A property that is designed to provide cabins or recreational
vehicle sites for transient overnight occupancy or use.
(3) Campground operator. – A person or governmental entity that owns, operates,
controls, or supervises a campground, regardless of profit status.
(4) Floodplain. – As defined in G.S. 130A-512(4).
(5) Governmental entity. – The State, a State agency, or a political subdivision of
the State.
"§ 130A-527. Safety requirements; emergency plans; submissions.
(a) Emergency Ladder; Plan Required. – A campground operator shall do all of the
following:
(1) Install and maintain in each cabin located within the floodplain an emergency
ladder capable of providing access to the cabin's roof.
(2) Develop an emergency plan addressing all of the following:
a. Evacuation of occupants upon issuance of a flash flood or flood
warning affecting an area of the campground within the floodplain.
b. Evacuation upon issuance of an evacuation order due to wildfire,
hurricane, or other disaster by the Governor or by a municipality or
county exercising authority under Chapter 166A of the General
Statutes.
c. Shelter in place upon issuance of a tornado warning or an order to
shelter in place by the Governor or by a municipality or county
exercising authority under Chapter 166A of the General Statutes.
Senate Bill 945-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Implementation Trigger. – A campground operator shall implement the plan upon
issuance of the specified warnings by the National Weather Service or upon issuance of the
specified evacuation or shelter directives by the Governor or by a municipality or county
exercising authority under Chapter 166A of the General Statutes.
(c) Submission. – The following apply:
(1) County submission. – A campground operator shall furnish the emergency
plan to the county emergency management coordinator appointed pursuant to
G.S. 166A-19.15(b) for the county in which the campground is located, or the
coordinator's designee.
(2) Municipal submission. – If the campground is located within a municipality
that has established an emergency management agency pursuant to
G.S. 166A-19.15(c), the operator shall also furnish the emergency plan to the
municipal emergency management coordinator, if any, or the coordinator's
designee.
(3) Joint agency. – If a joint emergency management agency has been formed
pursuant to G.S. 166A-19.15(d) with jurisdiction over the campground's
location, delivery to the coordinator, or the coordinator's designee, of the joint
agency satisfies subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection.
(d) Confidentiality. – An emergency plan furnished to a governmental entity under this
section is not a public record as defined in G.S. 132-1 and shall be kept confidential. The plan
may be disclosed only to the extent necessary for emergency management, public health, or law
enforcement purposes.
"§ 130A-528. Fire and life-safety standards.
(a) Building Code and Fire Code Authority. – Nothing in this Part alters the authority of
the Building Code Council, the Office of the State Fire Marshal, or any local official enforcing
the North Carolina State Building Code, including the North Carolina Fire Code.
(b) Documentation. – For purposes of inspection and enforcement of this Part, a
campground operator shall maintain documentation of approvals and inspections issued by the
authority having jurisdiction under the North Carolina State Building Code for any cabins or
other structures for which such approvals or inspections are required and shall make the
documentation available to the Department or the local health department upon request.
(c) Building Code Interpretation. – Nothing in this Part authorizes the Department or a
local health department to interpret or enforce the North Carolina State Building Code.
"§ 130A-529. Rulemaking; enforcement; coordination with Building Code.
(a) Rulemaking. – The Commission for Public Health may adopt rules necessary to
implement this Part. Rules adopted under this Part shall not conflict with the North Carolina State
Building Code, including the Fire Code, and the Commission shall consult with the Building
Code Council and the Office of the State Fire Marshal in developing such rules.
(b) Enforcement. – The Department and local health departments may enforce this Part
using the enforcement authorities available under Part 2 of Article 1 of this Chapter, as
applicable, including those provided in G.S. 130A‑17 through G.S. 130A-20. Appeals shall
proceed in accordance with G.S. 130A-24.
(c) Coordination. – Where a campground is operated as part of a youth camp, the
Department and local health departments shall coordinate inspections and enforcement under this
Part with Part 1 of this Article to minimize duplicative actions."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 130A-22 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(b4) The Secretary or the local health director may assess an administrative penalty of not
more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation of Part 1 of Article 25 of this Chapter
or a rule adopted under it. Each day of a continuing violation may be treated as a separate
violation. In determining the amount of the penalty, the assessing official shall consider factors,
Page 12 Senate Bill 945-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
including the degree of risk to public health and safety, the duration and gravity of the violation,
corrective actions, prior record, and costs to the State and county of enforcement."
SECTION 2. G.S. 130A-248 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(h) When a facility is permitted as a youth camp under G.S. 130A-514, the Department
and local health departments shall coordinate permitting and inspection activities under this
section with permitting and inspection under Part 1 of Article 25 of this Chapter to minimize
duplication. A permit issued under G.S. 130A-514 does not substitute for any permit required by
this section or by other law for food service establishments or lodging establishments or for any
public swimming pool or onsite wastewater system regulated elsewhere in this Chapter; however,
inspections may be scheduled and documented on a consolidated basis using standardized forms
prescribed by the Department."
SECTION 3.(a) Rulemaking Authority. – The Commission for Public Health shall
adopt permanent rules to implement this act and may adopt temporary rules pursuant to
G.S. 150B-21.1. In developing rules, the Commission shall consult with the North Carolina
Building Code Council and the Office of the State Fire Marshal and shall not adopt rules that
conflict with the North Carolina State Building Code, including the Fire Code.
SECTION 3.(b) Conforming Rule Changes. – The Commission shall amend its
rules, as necessary, to conform to the provisions of this act, including rules governing summer
camps, resident camps, and primitive experience camps, to recognize the Department as the
permitting authority under G.S. 130A-514 and to implement the emergency plan requirements of
G.S. 130A-522.
SECTION 3.(c) Temporary Rules. – Temporary rules shall be adopted and become
effective no later than March 1, 2027. Temporary rules shall not establish an initial compliance
date earlier than 30 days after the date the temporary rules become effective. Temporary rules
shall remain in effect until the effective date of permanent rules adopted pursuant to this act that
replace the temporary rules.
SECTION 3.(d) Permanent Rules. – The Commission shall adopt permanent rules
no later than October 1, 2027.
SECTION 4.(a) Forms, Systems, and Training. – The Department of Health and
Human Services shall do all of the following on or before the date temporary rules adopted
pursuant to this act become effective:
(1) Make available standardized forms, templates, instructions, and an electronic
submission process sufficient to accept permit applications, emergency plans,
and other submissions required under Article 25 of Chapter 130A of the
General Statutes.
(2) Establish the database required by G.S. 130A-522(i) and provide access to the
entities described in that subsection.
(3) Provide guidance and training materials to local health departments to support
consistent implementation.
SECTION 4.(b) Emergency Plan Submissions. – Notwithstanding
G.S. 130A-522(f), a youth camp operator or a facility described in G.S. 130A-513 is not required
to submit an emergency plan to the Department before the date that is 60 days after the date
temporary rules adopted pursuant to this act become effective. On and after that date, emergency
plans shall be submitted in the form and manner prescribed by the Department and in accordance
with G.S. 130A-522(f).
SECTION 4.(c) Permit Phase-In. – Notwithstanding G.S. 130A-514(a), the
following apply:
(1) Permit requirement. – A permit under Article 25 of Chapter 130A of the
General Statutes is required on and after the date that is 60 days after the date
temporary rules adopted pursuant to this act become effective. This
subdivision applies to permit applications submitted on or after that date.
Senate Bill 945-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Temporary bridge for emergency plan approval. – For the period beginning
on the date described in subdivision (1) of this subsection and ending
December 31, 2027, the Department may issue or renew a permit
notwithstanding the requirement for plan approval in G.S. 130A-514(b) and
G.S. 130A-522(f)(5) if the youth camp operator has submitted an emergency
plan in accordance with G.S. 130A-522(f)(1) and certifies compliance with
temporary rules adopted pursuant to this act, in the form and manner
prescribed by the Department. The Department may deny, suspend, revoke,
or refuse to renew a permit as authorized by law if the operator fails to cure
deficiencies identified by the Department within the time allowed under
G.S. 130A-522(f).
(3) Hard launch. – On and after January 1, 2028, the Department shall not issue
or renew a permit unless the emergency plan has been approved in accordance
with G.S. 130A-522(f).
SECTION 4.(d) Online List. – The Department shall establish the online list required
by G.S. 130A-519 no later than the date the permit requirement begins under subsection (c) of
this section.
SECTION 4.(e) Inspections. – Notwithstanding G.S. 130A-523(a), the requirement
to inspect each youth camp at least once each calendar year applies to inspections conducted on
or after January 1, 2028. Nothing in this subsection limits inspections conducted as needed to
ensure compliance or to address an imminent hazard as authorized by law.
SECTION 4.(f) Youth Camp Safety Multidisciplinary Team. – The appointing
authorities for the members described in G.S. 130A-516(b)(8) and (9) shall make the initial
appointments no later than 30 days after this act becomes law. Each agency or entity listed in
G.S. 130A-516(b)(1) through (7) shall designate its representative not later than 30 days after
this act becomes law. The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services shall
convene the first meeting of the Team no later than 60 days after this act becomes law.
SECTION 4.(g) Agency Preparations. – The Commission for Public Health, the
Department of Health and Human Services, the Youth Camp Safety Multidisciplinary Team
established in G.S. 130A-516, and the agencies represented on the Team may begin rulemaking,
guidance development, interagency coordination, and implementation when this act becomes
law.
SECTION 5. Funding. – The sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in
recurring funds beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Department of Health and Human Services for implementation of the requirements of this
act. The Department may establish up to four positions with the funds appropriated by this
section.
SECTION 6. Effective Date. – Section 5 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 14 Senate Bill 945-First Edition